Utah statutes.
73-18-10.   Owner of boat livery -- Duties.
(1)  The owner of a boat livery shall keep a record of the following: the name
and address of the person hiring any vessel; the identification number of the
vessel; the vessel's departure date and time; and the vessel's expected time
of return.  The record shall be preserved for at least one year.
(2)  Neither the owner of a boat livery nor his agent or employee may permit
any vessel to depart from the premises of the boat livery unless the owner has
equipped it as required under this chapter and unless he has advised the
lessee or renter of the vessel of all rules promulgated under this chapter
which the lessee or renter must obey.
